Rhode Island statutes. Title 25 Holidays and Days of Special Observance
Chapter 2 Days of Special Observance

25-2-1.
Rhode Island Independence Day.

The fourth day of May in each and every year is established, in this state, as a day for celebration of Rhode Island independence, being a just tribute to the memory of the members of our general assembly, who, on the fourth day of May, 1776, in the State House at Providence, passed an act renouncing allegiance of the colony to the British crown and by the provisions of that act declared Rhode Island sovereign and independent, the first official act of its kind by any of the thirteen (13) American colonies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1591, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 64, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 66, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 21, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

25-2-1

.

25-2-2.
Artillery salute and display of flags on Independence Day.

On each and every fourth day of May, except when the day falls on the first day of the week (commonly called Sunday), then on the day following, the governor shall cause salutes of thirteen (13) guns to be fired, at 12 o’clock, noon, by detachments of the state artillery at all places in the state where stationed, and shall cause a display of state and national flags on all armories and other state buildings from sunrise to sunset, in celebration of Rhode Island independence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1591, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 64, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 66, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 21, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

25-2-2

.

25-2-3.
School observance of Rhode Island Independence Day.

The teachers of the public schools shall annually prepare a program of patriotic exercises for the proper observance of Rhode Island independence in the schools.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1591, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 64, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 66, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 21, § 3; P.L. 1939, ch. 689, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

25-2-3

.

25-2-4.
Narragansett Indian Day.

The last Saturday before the second Sunday in August shall annually be set apart as a day to be known as the “Rhode Island Indian Day of the Narragansett tribe of Indians.” The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places and otherwise commemorative of the Narragansett tribe of Indians.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 294, § 2; P.L. 1936, ch. 2331, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 646, § 2; P.L. 1945, ch. 1557, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

25-2-4

.

25-2-5.
Old Home Week designated.

The calendar week beginning with the first Sunday of July in each year, or any subsequent week during the months of July, August, or September in each year, is designated as “Old Home Week,” and is set apart as a season during which cities and towns may conduct appropriate celebrations in honor of returning sons and daughters of the state and other invited guests and may hold exercises of historical interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1469, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 54, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 55, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 340, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

25-2-5

.

25-2-6.
Town appropriations for Old Home Week.

Cities by their city councils, and towns at legal town meetings, may appropriate money for the observance of “Old Home Week.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1469, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 54, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 55, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 340, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

25-2-6

.

25-2-7.
Veteran Firefighters’ Muster Day.

The governor shall issue an annual proclamation calling for proper observance of “Veteran Firefighters’ Muster Day.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

25-2-7

.

25-2-8.
Disabled American Veterans Day.

The thirty-first day of July shall annually be set apart as a day to be known as “Disabled American Veterans Day” or “D.A.V. Day.” The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places and otherwise commemorating the disabled American veterans.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 195, § 1.

25-2-9.
VFW Loyalty Day.

The governor shall issue an annual proclamation calling for proper observance of the first day of May in each and every year as “V.F.W. Loyalty Day.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 174, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

25-2-7

.

25-2-10.
Italian-American Veterans Daisy Day.

The first Saturday of June in each and every year shall be set apart as the “Italian-American War Veterans of the United States, Incorporated Field Daisy Day.” The day is to be known as “ITAM-Vets Daisy Day,” and is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 140, § 1.

25-2-11.
Founders Day of Italian-American War Veterans of the United States, Inc. Incorporated.

The fifteenth day of February in each and every year shall be set apart as a day to be known as “Founders Day of the Italian-American War Veterans of the United States, Incorporated.” The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places and commemorating the founding of the organization and its members.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 195, § 1.

25-2-12.
National Police Memorial Day and National Police Week.

The fifteenth day of May in each and every year is established as a day for celebration of “National Police Memorial Day” to commemorate state and local police officers who have died in the line of duty.

The calendar week containing May fifteenth in each year is designated as “National Police Week,” and is set apart as a period during which the state and its cities and towns may conduct appropriate exercises in honor of those men and women who have given their lives in the war against crime while protecting the lives and property of our citizens.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 28, § 1.

25-2-13.
White Cane Safety Day — Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of this state:

To encourage and enable persons with vision impairments to participate fully in the social and economic life of the state and to engage in remunerative employment;

To be employed in the state service, the service of the political subdivisions of the state, in the public schools, and in all other employment supported in whole or in part by public funds on the same terms and conditions as the able bodied, unless it is shown that the particular disability prevents the performance of the work involved;

To have the same right as the able bodied to the full and free use of the streets, highways, sidewalks, walkways, public buildings, public facilities, and other public places; and

To be entitled to full and equal accommodations, advantages, facilities, and privileges of all common carriers, airplanes, motor vehicles, railroad trains, motor buses, street cars, boats, or any other public conveyances or modes of transportation, hotels, lodging places, places of public accommodation, amusement, or resort, and other places to which the general public is invited, subject only to the conditions and limitations established by law and applicable alike to all persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 31, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 59; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 59.

25-2-14.
White Cane Safety Day — Proclamation.

Each year the governor shall take suitable public notice of October 15 as “White Cane Safety Day.” The governor shall issue a proclamation in which he or she:

Comments upon the significance of the white cane;

Calls upon the citizens of the state to observe the provisions of the white cane law and to take precautions necessary to the safety of the people who are disabled;

Reminds the citizens of the state of the policies with respect to people who are disabled as declared in §

25-2-13

and urges the citizens to cooperate in giving effect to them; and

Emphasizes the need of the citizens to be aware of the presence of people who are disabled in the community and to keep safe and functional for people who are disabled the streets, highways, sidewalks, walkways, public buildings, public facilities, other public places, places of public accommodation, amusement, and resort, and other places to which the public is invited, and to offer assistance to people who are disabled upon appropriate occasions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 31, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 59; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 59; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 3.

25-2-15.
General Casimir Pulaski Day.

The eleventh day of October shall be set apart as a day to be known as “General Casimir Pulaski Day.” The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 40, § 1.

25-2-16.
American History Month.

The month of February in each year is designated as “American History Month.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 19, § 1.

25-2-17.
Dauphine Day.

The twenty-first day of April shall be set apart as a day to be known as “Dauphine Day” in honor of the arrival of the “Dauphine” to Rhode Island in 1524. The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 15, § 1.

25-2-18.
Martin Luther King, Jr. Day — Proclamation — Observance.

Each year the governor shall take suitable public notice of January 15 as “Martin Luther King, Jr. Day” and shall issue a proclamation at a public memorial ceremony in the State House or at any other suitable location within the state of Rhode Island as the Martin Luther King, Jr. State Holiday Commission deems necessary and proper. The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 212, § 1.

25-2-18.1.
Martin Luther King, Jr. State Holiday Commission.

There is created a permanent commission to be known as the Martin Luther King, Jr. State Holiday Commission to consist of thirteen (13) members, three (3) of whom shall be from the house of representatives, not more than two (2) from the same political party, to be appointed by the speaker; three (3) of whom shall be from the senate, not more than two (2) from the same political party to be appointed by the president of the senate; three (3) of whom shall be representatives of the general public, to be appointed by the speaker; two (2) of whom shall be representatives of the general public to be appointed by the president of the senate; one of whom shall be a representative of the governor’s office, to be appointed by the governor; and one of whom shall be the lieutenant governor, all of the foregoing to be known as commission members. The commission shall appoint not more than sixteen (16) representatives from organizations and groups generally identified with and thought to epitomize the ideals of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., all of whom shall be known as nonvoting affiliate members, to serve for two (2) year terms.

The purpose of the commission shall be to plan, supervise and administer, in conjunction with the federal Martin Luther King Day Commission and the Martin Luther King Center for Non-Violent Social Change, an appropriate celebration to commemorate the birthday of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., and the annual observance of Dr. Martin Luther King Day, which will be observed on the third Monday in January each year. The commission shall not limit its activities to the annual celebration, but shall endeavor to promote educational efforts throughout the year, as well as to promote seminar events during the annual celebration that will be of informative value to all segments of the Rhode Island community.

The members of the commission shall, in February of each odd-numbered year, elect from among themselves a chairperson, who shall be a legislator, and a vice-chairperson, who shall not be a government official or employee. Vacancies in the commission shall be filled in like manner as the original appointment.

The commission is empowered to appoint committees to study specialized areas of concern and to report their findings and recommendations to the commission; provided, however, that one of these committees shall be an education committee.

The commission is empowered to establish a Martin Luther King Scholarship Fund and to award scholarships from the fund. Decisions concerning scholarship awards shall be made by the education committee of the commission in conjunction with the division of higher education assistance.

The commission is empowered to apply for and receive grants, appropriations, or gifts from any federal, state, or local agency, from any public or private foundation, and from any person, firm, or corporation in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The allocation of any funds received shall be decided by a majority vote of voting members in attendance at a meeting duly convened for the conduct of business by the commission.

Seven (7) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.

The commission shall meet at least four (4) times per year.

The commission shall adopt policies concerning the responsibilities of its voting members and nonvoting affiliate members, including attendance at commission meetings.

All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish advice and information, documentary and otherwise, to the commission and its agents as may be necessary or desirable to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.

The speaker is authorized and directed to provide suitable quarters for the commission.

The commission shall file a report with the general assembly outlining its plans for the celebration on or before December 15 each year prior to the celebration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 56; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 12.

25-2-19.
Rhode Island School Bus Safety Week.

The second week of March in each year is designated as “Rhode Island School Bus Safety Week.” The week is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 5, § 1.

25-2-20.
Viet Nam Veterans’ Day.

The twenty-ninth day of March shall annually be set aside as a day to be known as “Viet Nam Veterans’ Day.” The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 325, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 315, § 1.

25-2-21.
Puerto Rican Recognition Week.

That period from July 23 through July 29 in each year is designated as “Rhode Island Puerto Rican Recognition Week.” The week is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 20, § 1.

25-2-22.
Motorcycle Safety Awareness Week.

The fourth week of April in each year is designated as “Motorcycle Safety Awareness Week.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 146, § 1.

25-2-23.
Cape Verdian Recognition Week.

That period from July 2 through July 9 in each year is designated as “Rhode Island Cape Verdian Recognition Week.” The week is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 159, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 181, § 1.

25-2-24.
Nurses’ Day.

The first Monday of May shall annually be set aside as a day to be known as “Nurses’ Day.” The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 69, § 1.

25-2-25.
National Women’s History Week.

The calendar week containing March eighth, “International Women’s Day,” in each year is designated as “National Women’s History Week.” The governor shall issue an annual proclamation inviting and urging the people of the state to observe the week in schools and other suitable places with appropriate exercises and study with an emphasis on the historical accomplishments of Rhode Island women. The department of elementary and secondary education, and the Rhode Island commission on women shall make appropriate information regarding the observance available to the people of the state and to schools within the limits of their budgets.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 3.

25-2-26.
Retired Teachers’ Day.

The first Wednesday of April shall annually be set aside as a day to be known as “Retired Teachers’ Day.” The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises, and the governor may issue an annual proclamation calling upon public schools and citizens of the state to observe the occasion and to take the opportunity to honor the retired teachers of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 26, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 286, § 1.

25-2-27.
Friendship Day.

The second Friday of May in each year is designated as “Friendship Day.” The day may be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 143, § 1.

25-2-28.
Lithuanian Independence Day.

The sixteenth day of February shall annually be set aside as a day to be known as “Lithuanian Independence Day.” The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 9, § 1.

25-2-29.
Saint Jean-Baptiste Day.

The twenty-fourth day of June shall annually be set aside as a day to be known as “Saint Jean-Baptiste Day” and the governor shall issue an annual proclamation inviting and urging the people of the state to observe this day in suitable places with appropriate ceremonies. Saint Jean-Baptiste Day shall commemorate the feast of Saint Jean-Baptiste as an important observance and show of appreciation for the significant cultural, economic, and civic contributions made by Franco-Americans that have served to enrich the culture and lifestyle of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 3.

25-2-30.
Arbor Day.

The last Friday in April shall annually be set aside as a day to be known as “Arbor Day.” The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 40, § 1.

25-2-31.
Workers’ Memorial Day.

The fourth Friday of April shall annually be set aside to be known as “Workers’ Memorial Day” and the governor shall issue an annual proclamation inviting and urging the people of the state to observe this day in suitable places with appropriate ceremonies. Workers’ Memorial Day shall be in remembrance of the courage and integrity of American workers and in particular be in remembrance of those workers who have been killed or injured in the course of their employment. Additionally, this observance will call to the attention of the people of our state the importance of workplaces that are healthy and safe for the prevention of workplace illness and injury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 195, § 1.

25-2-32.
Destroyer Escort Day.

The third Saturday of June in each year shall be set aside as a day to be known as “Destroyer Escort Day” to highlight in the state the role of the destroyer Escort in the naval service. The day may be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 31, § 1.

25-2-33.
Peter Francisco Day.

The fifteenth day of March shall annually be set aside to be known as “Peter Francisco Day” and the governor shall issue an annual proclamation inviting and urging people of the state to observe this day in suitable places with appropriate ceremonies. Peter Francisco Day shall be in remembrance of the feats of valor and courage during our nation’s war for independence of Peter Francisco, who was found without family or home at the age of five in Virginia, apparently separated from his Portuguese immigrant parents. This observance will call to the attention of the people of our state the heroism in our nation’s many wars of American soldiers of Portuguese ancestry.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 60, § 1.

25-2-34.
Social Workers’ Day.

The second Wednesday of March shall annually be set aside as a day to be known as “Social Workers’ Day.” The day may be observed by the people of the state with appropriate exercises and the governor may issue an annual proclamation calling upon the citizens of the state to observe the occasion and to take the opportunity to honor the social workers of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 381, § 1.

25-2-35.
POW-MIA’s Day.

The third Friday of September shall annually be set aside as a day to be known as “POW-MIA’s Day.” The day may be observed by the people of the state with appropriate exercises and the governor may issue an annual proclamation calling upon the citizens of the state to observe the occasion and to take the opportunity to honor persons from this state and the nation who are prisoners-of-war or missing in action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 108, § 1.

25-2-36.
Rhode Island Speech-Language-Hearing Awareness Week.

The first week of May in each year is designated as “Rhode Island Speech-Language-Hearing Awareness Week.” The week is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 1, § 1.

25-2-37.
American Indian Heritage Day.

The twenty-fourth day of September shall annually be set apart as a day to be known as “American Indian Heritage Day.” The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places and commemorative of the American Indians.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 193, § 1.

25-2-38.
Gaspee Days.

The second Saturday and the following Sunday of June in each and every year shall be set aside as days to be known as “Gaspee Days” to commemorate the 1772 burning of the British schooner HMS Gaspee. The days are to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 208, § 1.

25-2-39.
Dr. George Washington Carver Recognition Day.

The fifth day of January shall annually be set apart as a day to be known as “Dr. George Washington Carver Recognition Day”. The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places and otherwise commemorative of Dr. George Washington Carver.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 298, § 1.

25-2-40.
Korean War Veterans Memorial Day.

The twenty-seventh day of July shall annually be set apart as a day to be known as “Korean War Veterans Memorial Day.” The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 316, § 1.

25-2-41.
Neighbor Day — Observance.

Each year the governor shall take suitable public notice of the Sunday prior to Memorial Day weekend as “Neighbor Day”. The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places in perpetuity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 14, § 1.

25-2-42.
Rhode Island Hero’s Day.

The second Thursday in May shall annually be set apart as a day to be known as “Rhode Island Hero’s Day.” The day is to be observed by the general assembly in recognition of a Rhode Island resident who has saved a human life and/or performed an act of heroism which merits any recognition determined by joint resolution of the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 427, § 1.

25-2-43.
Combat Veterans’ Day.

The third Saturday of April shall annually be set apart as a day to be known as “Combat Veterans’ Day.” The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 15, § 1.

25-2-44.
Cesar Chavez Day.

The thirty-first day of March shall annually be set aside to be known as “Cesar Chavez Day” and the governor shall issue an annual proclamation inviting and urging people of the state to observe this day in suitable places with appropriate ceremonies. “Cesar Chavez Day” shall be remembrance of the accomplishments of Cesar Chavez on behalf of our nation’s farm workers. The United Farm Workers of America, AFL-CIO under his leadership was, and is, a force for economic and social justice for farm workers. He shall also be remembered for conducting this struggle utilizing the principles of nonviolence.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 372, § 1.

25-2-45.
Italian-American Heritage Month.

The month of October shall annually be set apart as a month to be known as “Italian-American Heritage Month.” The month shall be observed by the people of this state with appropriate ceremonies and activities that celebrate the many contributions Italian-Americans have made to our state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 65, § 1.

25-2-46.
Gold Star Family Day.

The third Sunday in October in each and every year shall be set aside as a day to be known as “Rhode Island Gold Star Family Day.” This nation and state owe an enormous debt to those grieving parents who have lost children in war. The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places, and shall cause a display of the state and American flags to be flown at half-staff over the Rhode Island State House to commemorate this day of remembrance to honor their memory.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 251, § 1.

25-2-46.1.
Rhode Island Blue Star Parents Day.

The first Sunday after Mother’s Day annually shall be set apart as a day to be known as “Rhode Island Blue Star Parents Day.” This day may be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercise in public places that celebrate the many contributions Blue Star Parents have and continue to make in our state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 140, § 1.

25-2-47.
Lung Cancer Awareness Month.

The month of November shall annually be set aside to be known as “Lung Cancer Awareness Month.” The department of health shall hold an annual community forum on Lung Cancer each year during this month.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 609, § 1.

25-2-48.
Firefighters’ and Police Officers’ Appreciation Day.

The eleventh day of September shall annually be set apart as a day to be known as “Firefighters’ and Police Officers’ Appreciation Day.” This day shall be observed by the people of this state with appropriate ceremonies and activities that honor and commemorate all the dedicated men and women who have lost their lives in the line of duty as Firefighters and Police Officers in our state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 227, § 1.

25-2-49.
Rhythm & Blues Heritage Month.

The month of August shall annually be set apart as a month to be known as “Rhythm & Blues Heritage Month.” The month shall be observed by the people of this state with appropriate ceremonies and activities that celebrate the heritage of rhythm and blues music in our state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 280, § 1.

25-2-50.
Dominican Republic Independence Day.

February 27th in each and every year shall be set apart as “Dominican Republic Independence Day.” The day is to be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 281, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 285, § 1.

25-2-51.
John Clarke Day.

The first Monday in the month of October shall annually be set apart as a day to be known as “John Clarke Day”. The day shall be observed by the people of this state with appropriate ceremonies and activities that celebrate the many contributions John Clarke made to our state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 168, § 1.

25-2-52.
Rhode Island Seabees Day.

The fifth (5th) day of March annually shall be set apart as a day to be known as “Rhode Island Seabees Day.” The day shall be observed by the people of this state with appropriate ceremonies and activities that celebrate the many contributions of the Navy Seabees.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 4, § 1.

25-2-53.
Ben Mondor Day.

Opening Day of the Pawtucket Red Sox shall annually be set apart as a day to be known as “Ben Mondor Day.” The day shall be observed by the people of this state with appropriate ceremonies and activities that celebrate the many contributions Ben Mondor made.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 8, § 1.

25-2-54.
Military nurses day.

The first Monday of June shall annually be set apart as a day dedicated to Rhode Island military nurses who served their country in all wars, campaigns, and engagements throughout the world. This day may be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 143, § 1.

25-2-55.
Amateur Radio Week.

The week ending in the fourth full weekend in the month of June shall annually be set apart as a week to be known as “Amateur Radio Week.” The week shall be observed by the people of this state with appropriate ceremonies and activities that celebrate the many contributions amateur radio operators have and continue to make in our state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 459, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 461, § 1.

25-2-56.
RI Patriot Guard Riders Day.

The twelfth (12th) day of April shall annually be set apart as a day dedicated to the RI Patriot Guard Riders. The RI PGR is an organization that attends the funerals of members of the armed forces, firefighters, first responders, and police. In addition to attending funerals, the group also greets troops returning from overseas at homecoming celebrations and performs volunteer work for veteran’s organizations. This day may be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places that celebrate the many contributions RI Patriot Guard Riders have and continue to make in our state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 276, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 329, § 1.

25-2-57.
Ataxia Awareness Day.

The twenty-fifth day of September shall annually be set apart as a day to be known as “Ataxia Awareness Day.” The day shall be observed by the people of this state with appropriate public awareness and educational activities and forums.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 143, § 1.

25-2-58.
“The Rhode Island Nine Beirut Marines” Observance Day.

The twenty-third day of October in each and every year shall be set aside as a day dedicated to the memory of the “Rhode Island Nine Beirut Marines” who lost their lives in the 1983 terrorist bombing attack on a marine compound in Beirut, Lebanon, that killed two hundred forty-one (241) American service personnel. The day shall be observed by the people of this state with appropriate exercises in public places and the governor may issue an annual proclamation honoring the memory of the nine marines from Rhode Island who made the ultimate sacrifice.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 429, § 1.

25-2-59.
Historical Cemetery Restoration/Awareness Day.

The second Saturday in the month of April shall annually be set apart as a day to be known as “Historical Cemetery Restoration/Awareness Day.” The day shall be observed by the people of this state with appropriate ceremonies and activities that raise awareness of the many historical cemeteries in our state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 285, § 1.